Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.900

Severability—1994 sp.s. c 9.

If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 904.]